Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.430

Retirement for service.

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age fifty-three shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-three.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-three.

[ 2000 c 247 s 904; 1993 c 517 s 3; 1991 c 343 s 18; 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Purpose—1993 c 517: See note following RCW 41.26.420.

Findings—Effective dates—1991 c 343: See notes following RCW 41.50.005.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 294: See notes following RCW 41.26.410.